California, session 20252026, SB796.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1797.182 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:1797.182. (a) All ocean, public beach, and public swimming pool lifeguards and all firefighters in this state, except those whose duties are primarily clerical or administrative, shall be trained to administer first aid and cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR).(b) The training shall meet standards prescribed by the authority, and shall be satisfactorily completed by those persons as soon as practical, but in no event more than one year after the date of employment.(c) Satisfactory completion of a refresher course that meets the standards prescribed by the authority in CPR and other first aid shall be required at least every three years.(d) The authority may designate a public agency or private nonprofit agency to provide for each county the training required by this section. The training shall be provided at no cost to the trainee.(e) (1) If a firefighter or lifeguard is subject to Chapter 2.3 (commencing with Section 100025.01) of Division 9 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations pertaining to first aid and CPR for public safety personnel, and is employed by a state agency, the authority shall act as the authorizing entity for optional CPR and first aid skills. the optional first aid and CPR skills specified in Section 100027.03 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.(2) The authority shall develop, implement, and monitor policies, protocols, and quality assurance and improvement (QA/QI) measures to ensure the safe and effective use of these skills.(f) As used in this section, “lifeguard” means any regularly employed and paid officer, employee, or member of a public aquatic safety department or marine safety agency of the State of California, a city, county, city and county, district, or other public or municipal corporation or political subdivision of this state.(g) As used in this section, “firefighter” means any regularly employed and paid officer, employee, or member of a fire department or fire protection or firefighting agency of the State of California, a city, county, city and county, district, or other public or municipal corporation or political subdivision of this state or member of an emergency reserve unit of a volunteer fire department or fire protection district.SEC. 2. Section 1797.183 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:1797.183. (a) All peace officers described in Section 13518 of the Penal Code, except those whose duties are primarily clerical or administrative, shall be trained to administer first aid and cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR).(b) The training shall meet standards prescribed by the authority, in consultation with the Commission on Peace Officers Standards and Training, and shall be satisfactorily completed by those officers as soon as practical, but in no event more than one year after the date of employment.(c) Satisfactory completion of either refresher training or appropriate testing that meets the standards of the authority in CPR and other first aid shall be required at periodic intervals as determined by the authority.(d) (1) If a peace officer is subject to Chapter 2.3 (commencing with Section 100025.01) of Division 9 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations pertaining to first aid and CPR for public safety personnel, and is employed by a state agency, the authority shall act as the authorizing entity for optional CPR and first aid skills. the optional first aid and CPR skills specified in Section 100027.03 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.(2) The authority shall develop, implement, and monitor policies, protocols, and quality assurance and improvement (QA/QI) measures to ensure the safe and effective use of these skills.